Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2102.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of November 24, 2004 (P.L.1270, No.153), referred to as the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System Law, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System, the Missing Endangered Person Advisory System and the Pennsylvania Purple Alert System; authorizing and directing the Pennsylvania State Police to establish and maintain [the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System] Pennsylvania's alert systems; assessing costs; and providing for immunity and penalties.1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. Section 1 heading of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1. Pennsylvania Amber Alert System [and], Missing Endangered Person Advisory System (MEPAS) and Pennsylvania Purple Alert System established.* * *(c) Pennsylvania Purple Alert System.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain the Pennsylvania Purple Alert System to assist in the recovery of a missing qualifying individual who is at special risk of harm or injury, through prompt notification to the general public, appropriate law enforcement authorities and other public agencies.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the term "qualifying individual" means an individual with a diagnosed intellectual, developmental, cognitive or neurological condition, including autism spectrum disorder, Alzheimer's disease when the individual is under the age of 60, dementia when the individual is under the age of 60, a traumatic brain injury or similar impairments.Section 3. Section 5(b) of the act is amended to read:Section 5. Immunity.* * *(b) Good Samaritan immunity.--Any person who provides, obtains or attempts to provide or obtain assistance for a child who is the subject of a Pennsylvania Amber Alert System notice [or], a person who is the subject of a Missing Endangered Person Advisory or a person who is the subject of a Pennsylvania Purple Alert System notice shall be immune from civil liability for acts or omissions in providing or obtaining or attempting to 20250HB2102PN2705 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide or obtain assistance except for acts or omissions intended to cause harm and for which the law does not recognize justification or that constitute gross negligence or willful, wanton or reckless conduct.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2102PN2705 - 3 - 12345